Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8207
Certificate of authority; expiration; renewal; fee.

The certificate of authority issued to a captive insurer shall expire on June 30 of each year. The director shall renew the certificate of authority upon payment of an annual renewal fee of five hundred dollars and all other required fees and the filing of all required reports.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 41.